Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Chapter 23. Soybean Board.

§ 3.2-2300.
Definitions.

“Country buyer”
means any person who buys soybeans from a producer.

“Exporter”
means any person offering soybeans for export sale.

“Handler”
means any processor, dealer, shipper, exporter, or any other business entity that purchases soybeans from a producer. The term shall also mean any person buying, accepting for shipment, or otherwise acquiring property in soybeans from a producer, and shall include a mortgagee, pledgee, lienor, or other person, public or private, having a claim against the producer, when the actual or constructive possession of such soybeans is taken as part payment or in satisfaction of such mortgage, pledge, lien, or claim. The term shall also mean any producer that transports and sells his soybeans out of state.

“Processor”
means any person who changes the physical form or characteristic of soybeans for the purpose of preparing them for sale.

“Producer”
means any person who grew soybeans in the Commonwealth and sold soybeans during the preceding three years.

“Seedsman”
means any person or firm who offers soybean seeds for sale.

History.

1970, c. 431, §§ 3.1-684.2, 3.1-684.13, 3.1-684.14; 1974, c. 297; 1978, c. 540; 1982, c. 603; 1985, c. 448; 1987, c. 476; 1990, c. 183; 1992, c. 124; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-2301.
Soybean Board; composition and appointment of members.

The Soybean Board, established by the passage of a referendum held pursuant to Chapter 431 of the 1970 Acts of Assembly, is continued within the Department. The Soybean Board shall be composed of 11 members appointed by the Governor from nominations by the several producer organizations representing soybean producers, the appointments to be subject to confirmation by the General Assembly. The several producer organizations representing soybean producers shall nominate at least two producers from each production area of soybeans. The Governor shall appoint at least one producer from each production area as described in §

3.2-2310

, and the membership of the Soybean Board shall always be composed of a majority of producers. The Governor shall appoint one member, if available, from each of the following classifications: seedsman, producer, processor, country buyer, and exporter. Such appointments shall be made from nominations from the several producer organizations representing soybean producers.

Each organization shall submit nominations at least 90 days before the expiration of the member’s term for which the nomination or recommendation is being provided. If the organizations fail to provide the nominations at least 90 days before the expiration date pursuant to this section, the Governor may appoint other nominees that meet the foregoing criteria.

History.

1970, c. 431, § 3.1-684.13; 1974, c. 297; 1978, c. 540; 1985, c. 448; 1987, c. 476; 2008, c. 860; 2011, cc. 691, 714.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, cc. 691 and 714, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act providing for (i) staggered terms for board, council, or commission members and (ii) two-year terms for chairmen appointed by the Governor shall not affect current members or chairmen whose terms have not expired as of July 1, 2011.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 691 and 714 are identical, and added the last paragraph.

§ 3.2-2302.
Soybean Board membership terms.

The terms for appointments to the Soybean Board shall be for three years. The Governor shall fill any vacancy occurring before the expiration of any term for the unexpired term. If possible, vacancies shall be filled from the production area or classification from which the vacancy occurred from nominations as described §

3.2-2301

.

History.

1970, c. 431, § 3.1-684.13; 1974, c. 297; 1978, c. 540; 1985, c. 448; 1987, c. 476; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-2303.
Soybean Board officers and compensation.

The Soybean Board shall elect a chairman and such other officers as deemed appropriate.

Members of the Soybean Board shall not receive compensation for attendance at meetings of the Soybean Board, but shall be reimbursed for actual expenses incurred in such attendance.

History.

1970, c. 431, § 3.1-684.13; 1974, c. 297; 1978, c. 540; 1985, c. 448; 1987, c. 476; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-2304.
Powers and duties of Soybean Board.

The Soybean Board shall have charge of the management and expenditure of the Virginia Soybean Fund established in the state treasury.

The Soybean Board may expend funds to provide for programs of research, education, publicity, and the promotion of the sale and use of soybeans; to manage the funds so as to accumulate a reserve for contingencies; to establish an office and employ such technical, professional, and other assistants as may be required; and to contract for research, publicity, advertising, and other promotional services.

The Soybean Board may establish an executive committee and charge it with powers, duties, and functions as is deemed proper.

The Soybean Board may enter into an agreement with the Federal Commodity Credit Corporation to collect the specified assessment on all soybeans pledged as collateral for a commodity credit corporation price support loan or purchase by the Federal Commodity Credit Corporation under its loan or purchase program.

The chairman of the Soybean Board shall make an annual report to the Soybean Board including a statement of the total receipts and disbursements for the year, and shall file a copy of such report with the Commissioner.

History.

1970, c. 431, § 3.1-684.13; 1974, c. 297; 1978, c. 540; 1985, c. 448; 1987, c. 476; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-2305.
Referenda.

Every five years from the date of the imposition of the tax assessment on soybeans, another referendum shall be held to determine whether the assessment for research, education, publicity, and promotion of the sale and use of soybeans shall be continued. The Board, upon petition by a group of soybean producers representing at least 33 percent of the Commonwealth’s production, as determined by the Commissioner, may provide for an advisory referendum on the continuation of the assessment. Upon finding that sufficient interest exists among the producers of soybeans in the Commonwealth to justify a referendum, the Board shall authorize the holding of a referendum. The cost of conducting any such referendum as above prescribed shall come from funds paid into the Virginia Soybean Fund. The Board shall adopt regulations governing the conduct of referenda pursuant to §

3.2-112

.

History.

1970, c. 431, § 3.1-684.11; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-2306.
Management of referenda; Commissioner’s duties; notice.

The Commissioner shall arrange for and manage any referendum conducted under this chapter.

The Commissioner shall, 60 days before the date upon which a referendum is to be held, mail notice to the clerk of the circuit court in each locality where soybeans are produced. The clerk of the court shall post the notice on the front door or public bulletin board of the courthouse and certify the posting to the Commissioner. The Board shall publish notice of the referendum in each newspaper of general circulation in the counties where the referendum is to be held at least 60 days before the holding of any referendum under this chapter. The notice shall contain the date, hours, and polling places or other ways for voting in such referendum, the amount of the assessment to be collected, the sources thereof, the means by which the sum shall be collected, and the general purposes for how the funds will be used.

The Commissioner shall prepare and distribute in advance of the referendum all necessary ballots, certificates, and supplies required for the referendum and shall, under regulations adopted by the Board, arrange for the use of polling places, if necessary.

The Commissioner shall, within 10 days after the referendum, canvass and publicly declare the results thereof and certify the same to the Governor and the Board.

History.

1970, c. 431, §§ 3.1-684.4, 3.1-684.7, 3.1-684.8; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-2307.
Question to be printed on ballots.

The question to be printed on the ballots used in a referendum held pursuant to this chapter shall be as follows:

“Do you favor additional research, education, publicity and the promotion of the sale and use of soybeans and the continuation of the levy of an assessment of two cents ($0.02) per bushel in accordance with the provisions of the Soybean Board?

_______________
Yes

_______________
No.”

History.

1970, c. 431, § 3.1-684.12; 1982, c. 603; 1990, c. 183; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-2308.
Persons eligible to vote.

Each producer who sold soybeans during the past three years next preceding the date of the referendum held pursuant to this chapter shall be eligible to vote in such referendum, provided that he shall so certify on forms that shall be prepared by the Board. Any person meeting such requirements shall be eligible to vote in the referendum, but no person shall be required to be a qualified voter in other respects.

History.

1970, c. 431, § 3.1-684.5; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-2309.
Referenda results; action of Governor.

If the Governor finds any referendum in order and that at least 60 percent of those voting are in opposition to the continuation of the assessment on soybeans, he shall so proclaim and upon such proclamation the assessment on soybeans will be discontinued. If the Governor finds that at least 60 percent of those voting are in favor of the continuation of the assessment on soybeans, the Governor shall not so proclaim.

History.

1970, c. 431, §§ 3.1-684.9, 3.1-684.10; 1982, c. 603; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-2310.
Production Areas designated.

The following production areas are designated for the purposes of this chapter:

Area I: Accomack and Northampton Counties;

Area II: Stafford, King George, Westmoreland, Northumberland, Richmond, and Lancaster Counties;

Area III: Spotsylvania, Caroline, Essex, Middlesex, Mathews, Gloucester, King and Queen, and King William Counties;

Area IV: Louisa, Fluvanna, Goochland, Hanover, Henrico, New Kent, Charles City, James City, and York Counties;

Area V: the Cities of Virginia Beach, Chesapeake, and Suffolk;

Area VI: Chesterfield, Dinwiddie, Prince George, Surry, Sussex, Isle of Wight, Southampton, Greensville, and Brunswick Counties; and

Area VII: Buckingham, Cumberland, Powhatan, Amelia, Prince Edward, Appomattox, Campbell, Charlotte, Lunenburg, Nottoway, Mecklenburg, Halifax, Pittsylvania, and Henry Counties.

History.

1970, c. 431, § 3.1-684.13; 1974, c. 297; 1978, c. 540; 1985, c. 448; 1987, c. 476; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-2311.
Virginia Soybean Fund established.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Virginia Soybean Fund, hereafter referred to as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All moneys levied and collected under the provisions of this chapter shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes set forth in this chapter.

In carrying out the purposes of this chapter, the Soybean Board may cooperate with other state, regional, national, and international agricultural organizations in research, education, publicity, and the promotion of the sale and use of soybeans. The Soybean Board may sell printed materials, rent exhibit space at meetings, and engage in any type of ethical revenue-producing activity to defray the costs of Soybean Board programs. The proceeds from such activities shall be promptly paid into the Virginia Soybean Fund.

Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the Soybean Board on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the duly authorized officer of the Soybean Board.

The Auditor of Public Accounts shall audit all the accounts of the Soybean Board as is provided for in § 30-133.

History.

1970, c. 431, §§ 3.1-684.17, 3.1-684.18; 1978, c. 540; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-2312.
Collection and disposition of assessment by handler; reports.

Every handler shall deduct from payments made to the producer for soybeans an assessment of two cents ($0.02) per bushel and shall remit such assessment to the Tax Commissioner pursuant to this chapter. The handler shall also deduct from payments made to the producer for soybeans any national assessment that shall be approved under federal law to supersede the state law and shall remit such assessment to the Tax Commissioner pursuant to this chapter. The Tax Commissioner shall provide to the Soybean Board copies of excise tax returns and other information as may be necessary for the Soybean Board to comply with Virginia and federal soybean assessment programs.

A report to the Tax Commissioner shall be on forms prescribed and furnished by the Tax Commissioner, and shall be a statement of the gross volume of soybeans handled by the handler and shall be filed with the Tax Commissioner by the date or dates as set forth by the Tax Commissioner covering soybeans handled during the preceding period, as set forth by the Tax Commissioner. The Tax Commissioner shall set forth the filing date or dates for reports and assessments and the period or periods to be covered after consultation with the Virginia Soybean Association and Soybean Board. The assessment levied on soybeans shall be due by the handler on the same day as the report is due. The assessment shall be paid to the Tax Commissioner and be promptly paid into the state treasury to the credit of the Virginia Soybean Fund.

Any assessment that is not paid when due shall be collected pursuant to §

3.2-1102

.

History.

1970, c. 431, § 3.1-684.14; 1982, c. 603; 1987, c. 476; 1990, c. 183; 1992, c. 124; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-2313.
Records to be kept by handlers.

The handler shall keep a complete record of the soybeans handled by him for a period of not less than three years from the time the soybeans were handled. Such records shall be open to the inspection of the Tax Commissioner and shall be established and maintained as required by the Tax Commissioner.

History.

1970, c. 431, § 3.1-684.15; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-2314.
Falsification of records; misdemeanor.

It is a Class 1 misdemeanor:

For any handler knowingly to report falsely to the Tax Commissioner the quantity of soybeans handled by him during any period.

For any handler to falsify the records of the soybeans handled by him.

For any handler to fail to preserve the records of the soybeans handled by him for at least three years from the time such soybeans are handled.

History.

1970, c. 431, § 3.1-684.19; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.